Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 27

Polygraph Examiners Act

62-27-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Polygraph Examiners Act.”

Acts 1978, ch. 900, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 62-2701; Acts 1982, ch. 720, § 3.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Private investigation and polygraph commission, title 62, ch. 26, pt. 3.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

62-27-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the private investigation and polygraph commission, created by § 62-26-301;

“Intern sponsor” means any qualified licensed Tennessee examiner who is approved by the commission for the purpose of supervising and furthering the education of the intern during the commission approved training program;

“Internship” means the study of polygraph techniques and of the administration of polygraph techniques by a trainee, referred to as an “intern” in this chapter, under the personal supervision and control of a local licensed polygraph examiner in accordance with a course of study prescribed by the commission at the commencement of the internship;

“Person” means any natural person, firm, association, copartnership or corporation; and

“Polygraph examiner” means any person who purports to be able to detect deception or verify truth of statements through instrumentation or by means of a mechanical device.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1981, ch. 489, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-2702; Acts 1982, ch. 720, § 4; 1999, ch. 252, §§ 1, 2, 4, 5, 6.

62-27-103. Minimum requirements for polygraph machines.

Any polygraph machine used to test or question individuals for the purpose of detecting deception or verifying truth of statements shall record visually, permanently and simultaneously:

A person's cardiovascular pattern;

A person's respiratory or breathing pattern; and

Electrodermal or galvanic skin response pattern as minimum standards of instrumentation.

Patterns of other physiological changes in addition to subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) may also be recorded.

The use of any other instrument or device to detect deception or to verify truth of statements that does not meet these minimum instrumentation requirements is prohibited except that another instrument or device may be used by law enforcement officers in the course of their full-time employment with a federal, state or local law enforcement agency who are certified to operate the instrument or device.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 4; T.C.A., § 62-2703; Acts 2000, ch. 821, § 1.

62-27-104. [Reserved.]

The commission shall issue rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and shall prescribe forms to be used in connection with it.

The commission shall prescribe rules requiring continuing education as a prerequisite for renewal of licenses as polygraph examiners in accordance with § 62-27-129.

The commission shall have the right and power to contract for the services of any licensed qualified polygraph examiner to assist with the administration and analysis of polygraph examinations.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 6; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1980, ch. 705, § 1; 1981, ch. 489, § 4; T.C.A., § 62-2705; Acts 1982, ch. 720, §§ 6-8; 1988, ch. 805, § 2; 1998, ch. 777, § 1; 1999, ch. 252, §§ 4, 5; 2003, ch. 206, § 5.

62-27-106. License requirement.

It is unlawful for any person, including a city, county or state employee, to administer polygraph examinations or to represent to be a polygraph examiner without holding a valid polygraph examiner's license issued by the commission.

It is unlawful for any person, other than a law enforcement officer acting in accordance with § 62-27-103(c), to operate any instrument or device to detect deception or verify the truth of statements that does not meet the minimum instrumentation requirements set forth in § 62-27-103(a) or to use any title or make any representation tending to indicate that the person is qualified to detect deception or verify truth of statements through the use of the instrument or device.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 7; 1981, ch. 489, §§ 5, 7; T.C.A., § 62-2706; Acts 1982, ch. 720, § 9; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1999, ch. 252, § 4; 2000, ch. 821, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-27-107. Qualifications for license.

In order to be eligible for a license as a polygraph examiner, an applicant must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commission that the applicant:

Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

Is a citizen of the United States;

Is of good moral character;

Has not been convicted of any felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude;

Holds a baccalaureate degree from a college or university accredited by a recognized regional or local accreditation committee or, in lieu of a baccalaureate degree, has at least two (2) years of college credits and has, for at least five (5) years immediately preceding the date of application, actively engaged in substantial criminal, counterintelligence or private investigative work;

Has graduated from a school of polygraph approved by the American Polygraph Association or the commission;

Has passed a licensing examination conducted by or under the supervision of the commission; and

Has satisfactorily completed an internship of six (6) months or, in lieu of the completion of the internship, has provided satisfactory evidence the applicant is currently actively engaged in the polygraph examinations business in another state that may or may not have professional licensing requirements and has been principally engaged in the business of conducting polygraph examinations in that state for at least five (5) consecutive years. An applicant pursuant to this subdivision (a)(8) shall also submit evidence of a current business license, tax records and a minimum of two (2) letters of recommendation from either former clients or government agency officials.

Each polygraph examining company organized for the purpose of employing two (2) or more polygraph examiners on a full-time salaried basis shall make application to the commission in writing under oath on forms prescribed by the commission. The application shall be accompanied by the required fee, which is not refundable. The application shall contain information that the commission deems necessary, including, but not limited to, the names of the corporate officers, the principal place of business, the business telephone number at the principal place of business and the specific name of the person to be contacted. Each company shall be required to certify that it employs only qualified licensed polygraph examiners who meet the qualifications required by this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 8; T.C.A., § 62-2707; Acts 1982, ch. 720, § 10; 1986, ch. 739, § 2; 1999, ch. 252, §§ 4, 5, 6; 2007, ch. 249, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

62-27-108. License applications.

An application for original license shall be made to the commission in writing under oath on forms prescribed by the commission and shall be accompanied by the required fee, which is not refundable.

The application shall contain information that the commission deems necessary to enable it to judge the qualifications of the applicant.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 10; T.C.A., § 62-2709; Acts 1982, ch. 720, § 11; 1999, ch. 252, § 4; 2018, ch. 745, § 15.

62-27-109. Reciprocity — Service of process on nonresidents.

Each nonresident applicant for an original license or a renewal license shall file with the commission an irrevocable consent that actions against the applicant may be filed in any appropriate court of any county or municipality of this state in which the plaintiff resides or in which some part of the transaction occurred out of which the alleged cause of action arose and that process on any such action may be served on the applicant by leaving two (2) copies of the process with the commission. The consent shall stipulate and agree that the service of process shall be taken and held to be valid and binding for all purposes.

The commission shall send forthwith one (1) copy of the process to the applicant at the address shown on the records of the commission by registered or certified mail.

A nonresident of this state who is a licensed polygraph examiner under the laws of another state or territory of the United States may apply for a license as a polygraph examiner in this state by submitting an application to the commission as provided in § 62-27-108. The commission may issue a license to the nonresident applicant without examination if the commission determines that the applicant has substantially met the qualifications for a license in this state. The commission may, in its discretion, refuse to issue a polygraph examiner's license to an applicant who is not a resident of this state.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 11; T.C.A., § 62-2710; Acts 1982, ch. 720, § 12; 1999, ch. 252, §§ 4, 5, 6.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

62-27-110. [Reserved.]

Upon approval by the commission, an internship permit shall be issued to an intern applicant who has completed a recognized polygraph school; provided, that the intern applicant applies for the license and pays the required fee.

The application shall contain information that may be required by the commission.

An internship permit shall be valid for the term of twelve (12) months from the date of issue. The permit may be extended or renewed for any term not to exceed six (6) months upon good cause shown to the commission. The intern may apply for an examiner's license after completion of six (6) months from the date of issue of the internship; provided, however, that all other requirements of this chapter are met.

An intern shall not be entitled to hold an internship permit after the expiration date of the original twelve (12) month period and six (6) month extension if an extension is granted by the commission until twelve (12) months after the date of expiration of the last internship license held by the intern.

All intern applicants are required to take and pass an intern examination as prescribed by the commission prior to commencement of the internship unless the applicant has completed a polygraph school or held a polygraph examiner license in this state in the immediate preceding twenty-four month period.

No intern may administer an actual polygraph examination without an intern permit.

All internship programs shall be subject to inspection and review by the commission at the times and in the manner that it prescribes. The commission may require that interns administer certain numbers and types of polygraph examinations during their period of internship.

In order to be eligible to serve as a sponsor for an intern polygraph examiner, a person must have held a valid Tennessee polygraph examiner's license for at least the immediately preceding two (2) years.

No licensed polygraph examiner may sponsor more than two (2) interns at any one time. Each sponsor shall submit to the commission on the prescribed forms progress reports on the sponsor's intern or interns every sixty (60) days.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 13; T.C.A., § 62-2712; Acts 1982, ch. 720, §§ 14-16; 1999, ch. 252, §§ 4-6; 2003, ch. 206, §§ 6-9.

62-27-112. Fees — Rules and regulations.

The commission shall issue rules and regulations to prescribe all fees necessary to administer this chapter.

The fees required by this chapter may be paid by the governmental agency employing the examiner.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 14; 1980, ch. 705, § 6; 1981, ch. 489, § 8; T.C.A., § 62-2713; Acts 1986, ch. 739, § 4; 1988, ch. 805, § 1; 1989, ch. 523, § 146; 1999, ch. 252, § 4.

62-27-113. Display of license.

A license or duplicate license, intern permit or duplicate intern permit must be prominently displayed at the place of business of the polygraph examiner or at the place of internship, or in the case of a company license, at the principal business location.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 15; T.C.A., § 62-2714; Acts 1986, ch. 739, § 5; 1999, ch. 252, § 4; 2003, ch. 206, § 10.

62-27-114. Notice of change of business address.

Any polygraph examiner or company licensed under this chapter shall notify the commission in writing within thirty (30) days of any change of business address.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 16; T.C.A., § 62-2715; Acts 1982, ch. 720, § 17; 1986, ch. 739, § 6; 1999, ch. 252, § 5.

62-27-115. Expiration and renewal of licenses.

All licenses shall expire the last day of the twenty-fourth month from issuance or renewal.

A license shall be subject to late renewal for a period of six (6) months following its expiration date by payment of the renewal fee plus a penalty as set by the commission for each month or portion of a month that elapses before payment is tendered.

Any person who fails to renew the person's license within six (6) months after its expiration must reapply for licensure.

Any polygraph examiner whose license expired while the polygraph examiner was in the federal service on active duty with the armed forces of the United States, the national guard called into service or training or in training or education under the supervision of the United States preliminary to induction into the military service may have the license renewed without examination if within two (2) years after termination of the service, training or education, except under conditions other than honorable, and this includes any charges of drug violations or felonies, the polygraph examiner furnishes the commission with an affidavit to the effect that the polygraph examiner has been so engaged and that the polygraph examiner's service, training or education has been so terminated.

Section 62-27-107(a)(2)-(4) and (8) must also be satisfied.

The continuing education requirements established pursuant to § 62-27-105 shall be satisfied prior to a license renewal.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 17; T.C.A., § 62-2716; Acts 1982, ch. 720, § 18; 1986, ch. 739, § 3; 1988, ch. 805, § 4; 1989, ch. 360, § 13; 1989, ch. 523, § 147; 1990, ch. 1026, § 44; 1999, ch. 252, § 4; 2008, ch. 1038, § 4.

Cross-References. Continuing education requirements, § 62-27-129.

62-27-116. Valid license prerequisite to court claim.

No action or counterclaim shall be maintained by any person rendering polygraph examiner services as defined by this chapter in any court in this state with respect to any agreement or service for which a license is required by this chapter, to recover the agreed price or any compensation under the agreement or for services for which a license is required by this chapter without alleging and proving that the person had a valid license at the time of making the agreement or performing the services.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 18; 1980, ch. 705, § 7; T.C.A., § 62-2717.

62-27-117. Grounds for license refusal, revocation or suspension.

The commission may refuse to issue or may suspend or revoke a license on any one (1) or more of the following grounds:

Failing to inform a subject to be examined as to the nature of the examination;

Failing to inform a subject to be examined that the subject's participation in the examination is voluntary;

Material misstatement in the application for original license or in the application for any renewal license under this chapter;

Willful disregard or violation of this chapter or of any regulation or rule issued pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, willfully making a false or misleading report, including an oral report, concerning an examination for polygraph examination purposes and for inquiring into areas prohibited by this chapter;

If the holder of any license has been adjudged guilty of the commission of any felony or has been adjudged guilty of the commission of any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude. However, an action taken under this subdivision (5) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title;

Making any willful misrepresentation or false promises to the person being examined or causing to be printed any false or misleading advertisement for the purpose of directly or indirectly obtaining business or interns;

Having demonstrated unworthiness or incompetency to act as a polygraph examiner as defined by this chapter or by any rule or regulation issued pursuant to this chapter;

Allowing one's license under this chapter or the polygraph instrument to be used by an unlicensed person in violation of this chapter;

Knowingly or willingly aiding or abetting another in the violation of this chapter or any regulation or rule issued pursuant to this chapter;

Where the license holder has been adjudged mentally incompetent as provided by state law;

Failing, within thirty (30) calendar days, to provide information requested by the commission as the result of a formal complaint to the commission that would indicate a violation of this chapter;

Failing to inform the subject of the results of the examination upon written request;

Failing to fully and completely inform the examinee of the examinee's rights and to follow the procedure for examination, as provided in this chapter; or

In the case of a company, willful disregard in the employment of polygraph examiners who demonstrate unworthiness or incompetency to act as polygraph examiners.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 19; 1980, ch. 705, §§ 8, 9; T.C.A., § 62-2718; Acts 1982, ch. 720, §§ 19, 20; 1986, ch. 739, § 7; 1999, ch. 252, §§ 4, 5, 6; 2018, ch. 745, § 16.

Cross-References. Revocation of license for violation by employee, § 62-27-119.

62-27-118. Review of license refusals, revocations or suspensions — Appellate review.

Any action by the commission pursuant to § 62-27-117, or any appellate review thereafter, shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 20; 1980, ch. 705, § 10; T.C.A., § 62-2719; Acts 1999, ch. 252, § 4.

62-27-119. Violation of chapter by polygraph examiner or intern.

Any unlawful act or violation of this chapter on the part of any polygraph examiner or intern shall not be cause for revocation of the license of any other polygraph examiner for whom the offending examiner or intern may have been employed, unless it appears to the satisfaction of the commission that the polygraph examiner-employer has willfully or negligently aided or abetted the illegal actions or activities of the offending polygraph examiner or intern.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 21; T.C.A., § 62-2720; Acts 1986, ch. 739, § 9; 1999, ch. 252, § 4.

62-27-120. [Reserved.]

62-27-122. Enjoining of violation of chapter.

The commission, in addition to the powers and duties expressly granted by this chapter, is authorized and empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction to enjoin any person who is practicing or attempting to practice as a polygraph examiner without possessing a valid license to so practice in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 24; 1980, ch. 705, § 11; T.C.A., § 62-2723; Acts 2003, ch. 206, § 1.

62-27-123. Violations — Penalties.

General polygraph examinations.

It is unlawful for any person to:

Falsify information on any intern progress report submitted pursuant to this chapter;

Include any question concerning a subject's sexual behavior or orientation in a polygraph examination, unless the matter is relevant to the examination. Before proceeding with the examination, the examiner must obtain the subject's written permission and the permission shall be made a part of the test record; and

Conclude a polygraph examination without affording the subject a reasonable opportunity to explain any deceptive reactions to relevant questions that are evident on the charts unless the examinee is represented by legal counsel and counsel requests the results be given to counsel rather than to the examinee.

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class C misdemeanor.

Tampering with license applicant's examination papers. It is a Class C misdemeanor for any commission member, its agents or employees to alter or in any way tamper with any person's examination paper that has been submitted for any examination for a license or for any intern permit conducted under this chapter.

Discrimination in approving applications for license. It is a Class C misdemeanor for any commission member, its agents or employees to in any way discriminate on the basis of race, national origin or sex in:

Accepting or approving applications for internships or for polygraph examiners;

The submission of examinations pursuant to the applications;

Administering or grading the examinations;

Suspending or revoking a license or intern permit; or

Any other action or decision made in the administration or enforcement of this chapter.

Polygraph examinations with respect to employment.

It is unlawful for a polygraph examiner to inquire into any of the following areas during a polygraph examination with respect to employment, unless the examination is administered as a result of an investigation of illegal activity in such area and the inability to pose relevant questions in relation to the illegal activity would be detrimental to the investigation:

Religious beliefs or affiliations;

Beliefs or opinions regarding racial matters;

Political beliefs or affiliations;

Beliefs, affiliations or lawful activities regarding unions or labor organizations;

Sexual preferences or activities;

Any disability covered by the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.); or

Actions or activities more than five (5) years preceding the date of the examination, except for felony convictions and violations of the Tennessee Drug Control Act, compiled in title 39, chapter 17, part 4.

A violation of subdivision (d)(1) is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 25; T.C.A., § 62-2724; Acts 1982, ch. 720, §§ 22, 24, 25; 1986, ch. 739, § 8; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1998, ch. 777, § 2; 2003, ch. 206, §§ 2, 3, 12, 13.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-27-124. Recordkeeping — Confidentiality.

All polygraph charts, question sheets, written reports, data sheets, opinions of the polygraph examiner based on chart analysis and other pertinent papers shall be kept on file for at least three (3) years from the date of the examination in a safe place under the direct control of the examiner or, if the examiner is not independent, the examiner's employer.

No records obtained by law enforcement officers or employees during official polygraph examinations shall be subject to disclosure under this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 900, § 7; 1981, ch. 489, §§ 5, 7; T.C.A., § 62-2706; Acts 1982, ch. 720, § 23; 1986, ch. 739, § 3; 1998, ch. 777, §§ 3, 4; 2003, ch. 206, § 14.

Cross-References. Audio and video taping of examinations, § 62-27-126.

Confidential records, § 10-7-504.

62-27-125. Protection of rights of examinee.

In order to protect the rights of the examinee in the administration of the polygraph examination, the following minimum procedures must be followed:

Each prospective examinee shall be required to sign a notification and receive a copy of the notification on a form prescribed by the commission prior to the beginning of a polygraph examination. The notification shall contain the following information:

That the examinee is consenting voluntarily to the examination;

That the examinee has the right to refuse to take a polygraph examination;

That the examinee has the right to refuse to answer any question;

That the examinee may terminate the examination at any time;

That the examinee has the right to make a written request to the examiner within thirty (30) days of the examination to be furnished the results of the examination upon the payment of a reasonable fee to be established by the board to cover the cost of the results and that, upon receipt of the written request and payment of the fee, the examiner shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the written request, provide the examinee with a written copy of any opinions or conclusions rendered as a result of the examination;

That the examinee or the examinee's attorney has the right to make an audio or video recording of the examination and pretest interview;

The name of the polygraph examiner, the examiner's polygraph examiner license number issued by the board and the examiner's business address; and

The name and address of the private investigation and polygraph commission.

If the polygraph examiner is a law enforcement official or other officer of the court, that fact shall be disclosed to the examinee prior to the commencement of the examination. The examiner shall further inform the examinee that should the examinee choose to proceed with the examination under such circumstances, any illegal activity disclosed during the examination may be used against the examinee in a court of law.

The board shall by rule and regulation establish appropriate forms and language to be contained on the forms to accomplish the purposes of this section.

Acts 1986, ch. 739, § 10; 2003, ch. 206, §§ 4, 15, 16.

Law Reviews.

Labor Law — Employment at Will — Public Policy Exceptions to the Employment at Will Doctrine, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 199 (1985).

62-27-126. Recording of examinations.

If prior to the commencement of the examination the examinee requests in writing that the examination be taped, an audio tape recording of the entire examination including pretest interviews shall be made. In the event that a test result shows that the examinee has been deceptive and the examinee has requested in writing that the examination be taped, the polygraph examiner shall keep the tape recording on file with other test results for a one-year period. The polygraph examiner shall inform the examinee that the tape recording and test results will be available to the examinee for inspection or copying during the one-year period.

Failure to tape record a preemployment examination pursuant to subsection (a) constitutes separate acts of examiner misconduct, which may result in revocation or suspension of the examiner's license by the commission.

The commission may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person setting forth a cause of action under this section, investigate and ascertain the facts and, if warranted, hold a hearing for reprimand or for the suspension or revocation of a license.

Complaints of alleged violations shall be filed in writing with the commission in a manner to be prescribed by the commission, and the commission shall prescribe the manner in which complaints shall be investigated.

All hearings shall be conducted pursuant to the requirements of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

If a polygraph examiner is found guilty of any violation of this section, the commission shall impose penalties and fines for the violations, including, but not limited to:

For a first violation, six (6) months' suspension of the examiner's license and a five hundred dollar ($500) fine upon reapplication for a license. Section 62-27-115(b)(2) is applicable to reapplication;

For a second violation, one-year suspension of the examiner's license and a one thousand dollar ($1,000) fine upon reapplication for a license. Section 62-27-115(b)(2) is applicable to reapplication; and

For a third violation, permanent suspension of the examiner's license and a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

Acts 1986, ch. 739, § 11; 1999, ch. 252, § 4.

Cross-References. Effect of failure to maintain audio and video tape files of examinations, § 62-27-124.

62-27-127. Frequency of exams by an examiner.

No licensed polygraph examiner shall conduct more than one (1) polygraph examination per hour.

Acts 1986, ch. 739, § 11.

62-27-128. Employer action based on polygraph exam.

No employer may take any personnel action based solely upon the results of a polygraph examination.

Acts 1986, ch. 739, § 11.

Law Reviews.

Revisiting the Tennessee Employment-At-Will Doctrine—What Is the Exception and What Is the Rule? (Frederick J. Lewis, Jeffery A. Jarratt), 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 171 (1989).

62-27-129. Continuing education requirements.

In prescribing requirements for continuing education as a prerequisite for licensure renewal under § 62-27-105, the commission shall, at a minimum:

Define the basic requirements to be no less than twenty-four (24) credit hours every two (2) years in polygraph;

Delineate qualifying programs; and

Establish a system of control and reporting.

The commission may extend the time within which licensees under this chapter are required to comply with continuing education requirements for reasons of poor health, military service or other reasonable and just causes.

Acts 1988, ch. 805, § 3; 1999, ch. 252, § 4; 2008, ch. 1038, § 5.

Cross-References. Expiration of license, § 62-27-115.

62-27-105. Rules and regulations — Assistance.

62-27-111. Internship.

62-27-121. [Reserved.]